Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 1. Appointment of Guardian

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Guardian and Ward §§ 12, 13, 179.

Consideration and weight of religious affiliations in appointment of guardian for minor child, 22 ALR2d 696.

Mental condition which will justify the appointment of guardian, committee or conservator of the estate for an incompetent or spendthrift, 9 ALR3d 774.

Who is minor's next of kin for guardianship purposes, 63 ALR3d 813.

39 C.J.S. Guardian and Ward §§ 7 to 50.

§ 3-2-101.
Petition for appointment of guardian.

Any person may file with the clerk a petition for the appointment of a guardian. The petition shall state:

The name, age and address of the proposed ward;

The status of the proposed ward as a minor, an incompetent person or a mentally incompetent person and the reasons for the petition;

The name and address of the proposed guardian, and his qualification as a fit and proper person to serve as guardian;

The residence of the proposed ward in the county or his presence in the county;

The facts to show that the best interest of the proposed ward requires the appointment of a guardian in this state;

The name and address of the person or facility having the care, custody or control of the proposed ward; and

The interests of the petitioner.

The district court may transfer jurisdiction of a petition for appointment of a guardian to the juvenile court if the proposed ward is a child who is under the prior and continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

In any matter concerning an adult, the provisions of chapter 8 of this title shall apply for the purposes of establishing jurisdiction over the matter.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1993, ch. 156, § 2; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 2009, ch. 196, § 1; 2013 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (b).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (c).

Appointment proper. —

Trial court
did not err in appointing a guardian because the 70-year-old ward,
who had been diagnosed with dementia, was living under horrifying
conditions in a house filled with hoarded articles and trash; his
home had been without running water since 2006 and had no toilet
or
shower facilities. Sands v. Brown (In re Sands), 2013 WY 60, 301 P.3d 128,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2013).

District court erred in vacating the grandmother's 2005 and 2006 guardianship appointment orders as void for lack of subject matter jurisdiction because, although the guardianship statutes did not authorize the appointment of a guardian for an unborn child, there was no question that the district court could have appointed a guardian for the child to take effect upon her birth; the district court had jurisdiction to act on the 2005 guardianship petition, but erred in its exercise of that jurisdiction; and the 2006 order extending guardianship was effectively a new appointment of the grandmother as the child's guardian as the district court made new findings of the need for the guardianship and outlined the guardian's obligations in detail. Clark v. Huffer (In re MKH), 2016 WY 103, 382 P.3d 1096,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2016).

Notice and Hearing. —

Court violated a mother's due process rights by appointing grandparents temporary guardians of a child without adherence to the statutory requirements regarding notice and a hearing; without affording the mother proper notice and an opportunity to be heard, the district court's establishment of the temporary guardianship lacked fundamental fairness.
KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Cosner v. Ridinger, 882 P.2d 1243,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1994).

In re FJO v. GS, 2007 WY 135, 165 P.3d 442,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Aug. 23, 2007).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Amount of attorney's compensation in matters invoking guardianship and trusts, 57 ALR3d 550.

Right of guardian or committee of incompetent or his estate, or to make expenditures, without approval by court, 63 ALR3d 780.

Validity of guardianship proceeding based on brainwashing of subject by religious, political or social organization, 44 ALR4th 1207.

§ 3-2-102.
Notice; when required; governed by rules of civil procedure.

Notice of filing of a petition for appointment of an involuntary guardianship shall be served on the proposed ward, his custodian and the proposed guardian.

Notice of filing of a petition for appointment of an involuntary guardianship shall be served on the proposed ward’s parents, agent or fiduciary under a known power of attorney, spouse and adult children who are known or who can be discovered with due diligence, except:

When a petition is filed under W.S.

3-2-108

; or

When for good cause the court determines that no notice is necessary if the proposed ward is under the age of eighteen (18) years.

Notice shall be served on any other person as ordered by the court.

Notice shall be given in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and as ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 1999, ch. 150, § 1; 2017 ch. 117, § 2, effective January 1, 2018.

The 2017 amendment

, effective January 1, 2018, in (b), added “agent or fiduciary under a known power of attorney.”

Notice and Hearing. —

Court violated a mother's due process rights by appointing grandparents temporary guardians of a child without adherence to the statutory requirements regarding notice and a hearing; without affording the mother proper notice and an opportunity to be heard, the district court's establishment of the temporary guardianship lacked fundamental fairness.
KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

AW v. TLW (in the Interest of DMW), 2009 WY 106, 214 P.3d 996,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Aug. 24, 2009).

Cosner v. Ridinger, 882 P.2d 1243,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 3-2-103.
Pleadings and trial; rules of civil procedure.

After the petition is filed, all proceedings are governed by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and the Wyoming Rules of Evidence. The petitioner, the proposed ward or his custodian may demand a jury trial as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

§ 3-2-104.
Appointment of guardian.

The court may appoint a guardian if the allegations of the petition as to the status of the proposed ward and the necessity for the appointment of a guardian are proved by a preponderance of the evidence.

The order appointing a guardian shall state the findings of the court, including:

The reasons why the ward is in need of a guardian;

The appointment of the guardian;

The duration of the appointment for a specified term or permanent, subject to W.S.

3-3-1101

;

The limited or plenary duties of the guardian.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1993, ch. 156, § 2; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to power of banks and trust companies to act as guardian or trustee, see §§

13-2-101

and

13-5-101

.

As to appointment of guardian to act for insane person in action for divorce on grounds of insanity, see §

20-2-105

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 4, provides:

Transitional provisions. “(a) An order appointing a limited guardian or a limited conservator under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall remain in effect until the date of termination specified in the order, or until otherwise terminated as provided by this subsection, but shall not be modified or extended. An order entered under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall terminate upon entry of an order appointing a guardian or conservator under any other provision of title 3 of the Wyoming statutes.

“(b) In the case of an order creating a guardianship under W.S.

3-2-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 1998], the duration of the appointment of the guardian shall be deemed to be permanent and the guardian may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(c) In the case of an order creating a conservatorship under W.S.

3-3-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act, the duration of the appointment of the conservator shall be deemed to be permanent and the conservator may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(d) In the case of a temporary guardianship or a temporary conservatorship created prior to, and continuing on the effective date of this act, the maximum duration periods specified by W.S.

3-2-106

and

3-3-107

shall apply as if the order creating the temporary guardianship or the temporary conservatorship had been entered on the effective date of this act.”

Denial of guardianship proper where unfitness of parents not established. —

District court did not err in denying the aunt's petition for permanent guardianship of the child because she did not establish the present unfitness of the parents as the evidence concerning the mother regarding her use of methamphetamine and serving time in jail for attempted robbery was a year old; the mother testified that she had made mistakes in the past, but that her life was now on track, and she was presently clean and not using drugs; and the father testified that, while he did not have custody of his other minor children, he remained involved in their lives and had been working to make up arrears in child support payments, and that he had stopped using both methamphetamine and marijuana. Eshleman v. Rosenberg (In re JR), 2016 WY 37, 368 P.3d 910,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2016).

Guardianship matters are controlled and governed exclusively by statute.

State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Father and mother are natural guardians of persons of minor children.

State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Appointment void without adjudication of incompetence. —

Where there had been no adjudication of incompetence, the district court is without jurisdiction to appoint a guardian, and such a purported order is void. Thoeming v. District Court of Sixth Judicial Dist., 379 P.2d 543,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1963) (decided prior to 1985 revision).

Guardian of person distinguished from guardian of estate. —

A guardian of the person is one lawfully vested with the care of the person of a minor or incompetent, while a guardian of the estate is entrusted with the control of the property of a minor or incompetent. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

And same person may be both

guardian of the person and guardian of the estate. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Standards. —

District court's order establishing the permanent guardianship of a mother's child with the grandparents violated the mother's fundamental parental rights because the court did not find that the mother was unfit as a parent, and therefore, the determination that a guardianship was necessary, based solely upon a best interests analysis, was clearly erroneous.
KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2006).

District court did not err in appointing stepsons'
stepmother, rather than the stepsons'
grandparents, as a guardian for the children because the stepsons'
father had died and the mother was unfit. Further, the appointment of the stepmother was in the children's best interests; therefore, the trial court was allowed to disregard the father's wishes.
AW v. TLW (In the Interest of DMW), 2009 WY 106, 214 P.3d 996,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2009).

Trial court did not err in granting grandparents' motion for plenary
guardianship on the ground that the child's mother was unfit under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 3-2-104(b) because the child had suffered serious emotional damage
as a result of sexual abuse that occurred while the child was residing
with the mother; a licensed counselor predicted that the child would
regress if returned to the mother.
KC v. CC (In re LNP), 2013 WY 20, 294 P.3d 904,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2013).

Notice and Hearing. —

Court violated a mother's due process rights by appointing grandparents temporary guardians of a child without adherence to the statutory requirements regarding notice and a hearing; without affording the mother proper notice and an opportunity to be heard, the district court's establishment of the temporary guardianship lacked fundamental fairness.
KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2006).

Continuation of guardianship was proper. —

Trial court
did not err in continuing a guardianship and conservatorship shortly
after the guardian was appointed because the 70-year-old ward, who
had been diagnosed with dementia, was living under horrifying conditions
in a house filled with hoarded articles and trash; his home had been
without running water since 2006 and had no toilet or shower facilities. Sands v. Brown (In re Sands), 2013 WY 60, 301 P.3d 128,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2013).

Guardianship could not continue without a finding that the mother was an unfit parent.
—

Once the mother showed that the paternal great-grandmother's guardianship over her child was no longer necessary for the reasons it had been established, the district court's finding that the guardianship should continue, based solely upon a best interest analysis, was clearly erroneous. The district court was required to find, and the guardian had the burden to prove, that the mother was an unfit parent.
DJM v. DM (In re SRB-M), 2009 WY 22, 201 P.3d 1115,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

In re FJO v. GS, 2007 WY 135, 165 P.3d 442,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Aug. 23, 2007).

Great-grandmother appointed legal guardian.
—

Where the mother was unable to care for her one-year old child because the mother was incarcerated in Colorado following the revocation of her probation, the paternal great-grandmother became the court appointed legal guardian of the minor child in accordance with this section.
DJM v. DM (In re SRB-M), 2009 WY 22, 201 P.3d 1115,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2009).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Function, power and discretion of court where there is testamentary appointment of guardian of minor, 67 ALR2d 803.

Priority and preference in appointing guardian of an incompetent, 65 ALR3d 991.

§ 3-2-105.
Appointment of guardian on voluntary petition.

A guardian may be appointed by the court upon the petition of the proposed ward, including a minor who has reached the age of fourteen (14) years, if the court determines that the appointment is in the best interest of the petitioner.

The petition shall state whether a notice of a petition for involuntary guardianship under W.S.

3-2-101

has been served on the proposed ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Court may appoint a guardian/conservator. —

Pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 3-2-105(a) and 3-3-106(a), when an involuntary petition for the appointment of a guardian/conservator is not filed prior to a hearing on a voluntary petition, the court may appoint a guardian/conservator for the ward solely on a finding that such an appointment would be in the best interest of the ward. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

Notice and Hearing. —

Court violated a mother's due process rights by appointing grandparents temporary guardians of a child without adherence to the statutory requirements regarding notice and a hearing; without affording the mother proper notice and an opportunity to be heard, the district court's establishment of the temporary guardianship lacked fundamental fairness.
KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2006).

Third parties. —

Wife did not lack standing in a guardian/conservator action, because Wyoming's statutory scheme for requesting the voluntary appointment of a guardian and conservator allows for third parties to become involved, and the wife was sufficiently affected to guarantee an actual justiciable controversy where she was properly situated with sufficient pecuniary, personal, and tangible interests at stake given a pending divorce action. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

Standards. —

District courts' order establishing the permanent guardianship of a mother's child with the grandparents violated the mother's fundamental parental rights because the court did not find that the mother was unfit as a parent, and therefore, the determination that a guardianship was necessary, based solely upon a best interests analysis, was clearly erroneous.
KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 3-2-106.
Appointment of a temporary or emergency guardian.

Upon the filing of a petition for a temporary guardian other than a petition for temporary guardianship for educational, medical care and dental care purposes pursuant to W.S.

3-2-301

through

3-2-303

and after a hearing the court may appoint a temporary guardian subject to any notice and conditions the court prescribes.

Except upon a showing of good cause, an order appointing a temporary guardian of an adult ward shall be limited to not more than ninety (90) days. The court may order an extension of the temporary guardianship for not more than an additional ninety (90) days, or conversion to a guardianship or conservatorship in accordance with W.S.

3-2-101

through

3-2-105

or

3-3-101

through

3-3-106

.

Except upon a showing of good cause, an order appointing a temporary guardian of a minor ward shall be limited to not more than one (1) year.

If the court finds that compliance with the procedures specified in this chapter will likely result in substantial harm to the proposed ward’s health, safety or welfare, and that no other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in the circumstances, the court, on petition by a person interested in the proposed ward’s welfare, may appoint an emergency guardian. Immediately upon receipt of the petition for an emergency guardianship, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the proposed ward’s best interests in the proceeding. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, reasonable notice of the time and place of a hearing on the petition shall be given to the proposed ward and any other persons as the court directs.

An emergency guardian may be appointed without notice to the proposed ward or the guardian ad litem only if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence from affidavit or testimony that the proposed ward will be substantially harmed before a hearing on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency guardian immediately, without notice to the proposed ward or the guardian ad litem, the proposed ward and guardian ad litem shall be given notice of the appointment within forty-eight (48) hours after the appointment. The court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment within seventy-two (72) hours after the appointment. Emergency guardians appointed without notice and hearing shall have authority to make medical and medically related decisions only, except emergency guardians shall not have authority with respect to a person who has been made a ward pursuant to this subsection or subsection (d) of this section to:

Execute a durable power of attorney for healthcare for the ward pursuant to W.S. 35-22-403(b);

Execute an individual instruction for the ward pursuant to W.S. 35-22-403(a);

Execute a cardiopulmonary resuscitation directive for the ward pursuant to W.S.

35-22-201

through 35-22-208;

Commit or admit the ward to a mental health facility; or

Direct the withdrawal of life sustaining procedures being used on the ward.

Appointment of an emergency guardian, with or without notice, is not a determination of the proposed ward’s incapacity.

At the seventy-two (72) hour hearing to determine the appropriateness of the appointment of an emergency guardian required by subsection (e) of this section, the court may appoint a temporary guardian pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. The court may remove an emergency guardian at any time.

Except as provided in subsections (d) through (g) of this section, all other provisions of this chapter concerning guardians apply to an emergency guardian.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 2003, ch. 174, § 1; 2005, ch. 161, § 2; ch. 193, § 2.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 161, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, in (e)(i), substituted “W.S. 35-22-403(b)” for “W.S.

3-5-202

”; in (e)(ii), substituted “an individual instruction” for “a living will,” and “W.S. 35-22-403(a)” for “W.S.

35-22-102

.”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 193, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, added the proviso pertaining to temporary guardianship for educational, medical care and dental care purposes pursuant to W.S.

3-2-301

through

3-2-303

in (a).

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 4, provides:

Transitional provisions. “(a) An order appointing a limited guardian or a limited conservator under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall remain in effect until the date of termination specified in the order, or until otherwise terminated as provided by this subsection, but shall not be modified or extended. An order entered under W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109 shall terminate upon entry of an order appointing a guardian or conservator under any other provision of title 3 of the Wyoming statutes.

“(b) In the case of an order creating a guardianship under W.S.

3-2-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 1998], the duration of the appointment of the guardian shall be deemed to be permanent and the guardian may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(c) In the case of an order creating a conservatorship under W.S.

3-3-104

entered prior to the effective date of this act, the duration of the appointment of the conservator shall be deemed to be permanent and the conservator may exercise the plenary duties authorized by statute unless otherwise specified in the order.

“(d) In the case of a temporary guardianship or a temporary conservatorship created prior to, and continuing on the effective date of this act, the maximum duration periods specified by W.S.

3-2-106

and

3-3-107

shall apply as if the order creating the temporary guardianship or the temporary conservatorship had been entered on the effective date of this act.”

Best interests. —

Pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 3-2-105(a) and 3-3-106(a), when an involuntary petition for the appointment of a guardian/conservator is not filed prior to a hearing on a voluntary petition, the court may appoint a guardian/conservator for the ward solely on a finding that such an appointment would be in the best interest of the ward. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

Notice and Hearing. —

Court violated a mother's due process rights by appointing grandparents temporary guardians of a child without adherence to the statutory requirements regarding notice and a hearing; without affording the mother proper notice and an opportunity to be heard, the district court's establishment of the temporary guardianship lacked fundamental fairness.
KO v. LDH (In re MEO), 2006 WY 87, 138 P.3d 1145,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2006).

Third parties. —

Wife did not lack standing in a guardian/conservator action, because Wyoming's statutory scheme for requesting the voluntary appointment of a guardian and conservator allows for third parties to become involved, and the wife was sufficiently affected to guarantee an actual justiciable controversy where she was properly situated with sufficient pecuniary, personal, and tangible interests at stake given the pending divorce action. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 3-2-107.
Who may be appointed as guardian; preference for appointment of guardians.

The court may appoint any qualified person as guardian of an incompetent person or a minor. The court may not appoint a person to be a guardian of an incompetent person or a minor if the person proposed to act as guardian:

Provides, or is likely to provide during the guardianship period, substantial services to the ward in a professional or business capacity unrelated to the person’s authority as a guardian;

Is, or is likely to become during the guardianship period, a creditor of the ward, other than in the capacity as guardian;

Has, or is likely to have during the guardianship period, interests that may conflict with those of the ward; or

Is employed by a person who would be disqualified under paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection.

A person may be appointed as guardian of a respondent, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section that would otherwise disqualify the person, if the person is the spouse, adult child, parent or sibling of the respondent and the court determines that the potential conflict of interest is insubstantial and that the appointment would clearly be in the best interests of the respondent.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section, qualified persons have priority for appointment as guardian of an incompetent person in the following order:

A person nominated by the respondent if at the time of the nomination the respondent has the capacity to make a reasonably intelligent choice;

The spouse of the respondent;

A nomination in the will of the respondent’s deceased spouse;

The parent of the respondent;

An adult child of the respondent;

A person named in the will of the respondent’s deceased parent;

A relative of the respondent with whom the respondent has resided for more than six (6) months during the year preceding the filing of the petition;

A relative or friend who has demonstrated a sincere, longstanding interest in the welfare of the respondent;

Any other person whose appointment would be in the best interests of the respondent;

A person with a guardianship program for incompetent persons.

Subject to subsection (e) of this section, qualified persons have priority for appointment as guardian of a minor in the following order:

The parent or parents of the minor;

The person nominated as guardian in the will of the custodial parent;

The person requested by a minor who has reached the age of fourteen (14) years;

Any other person whose appointment would be in the best interests of the minor.

The court shall consider the priorities established in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, but shall not be bound by those priorities. The court shall appoint the person who is best qualified and willing to serve as guardian.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 2004, ch. 68, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote the section, to specify who may be appointed as a guardian for an incompetent person or a minor and to specify the order of preference for appointment, adding (a) through (c) and (e) and rewriting former (a) as (d).

Appointment Proper. —

District court did not err in appointing stepsons'
stepmother, rather than the stepsons'
grandparents, as a guardian for the children because the stepsons'
father had died and the mother was unfit. Further, the appointment of the stepmother was in the children's best interests; therefore, the trial court was allowed to disregard the father's wishes.
AW v. TLW (In the Interest of DMW), 2009 WY 106, 214 P.3d 996,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2009).

Disqualification. —

Use of the
language, “likely to have” and “may,” in this section expresses a
legislative concern with even the potential of a conflict between
the interests of a guardian and ward; because the nieces' potential
to inherit from their uncle need not be shown to be of a particular
magnitude or immediacy to be a disqualifying interest, the district
court did not err in finding that the nieces had a conflict of interest
that disqualified them from serving as their uncle's guardians. Utley v. Lankford (In re Lankford), 2013 WY 65, 301 P.3d 1092,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2013).

Because the
district court could only consider that the uncle might die penniless
or change his will, thus affecting the amount of the nieces' inheritance,
if any, only if the proposed guardian was the spouse, adult child,
parent or sibling of the ward, the district court did not err in denying
the nieces' petition for guardianship of their uncle. Utley v. Lankford (In re Lankford), 2013 WY 65, 301 P.3d 1092,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of infant to select his own guardian, 85 ALR2d 921.

§ 3-2-108.
Appointment of guardian on a standby basis.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian of the petitioner on a standby basis may be filed by any person under the same procedure and requirements as provided in W.S.

3-3-301

through

3-3-306

for appointment of a standby conservator, insofar as applicable.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-2-109.
Guardian's report.

The guardian shall present to the court and file in the guardianship proceedings a signed, written, report on the physical condition, including level of disability or functional incapacity, principal residence, treatment, care and activities of the ward, as well as providing a description of those actions the guardian has taken on behalf of the ward:

Within six (6) months of the guardian’s appointment;

Every six (6) months following the initial report;

Within thirty (30) days of his removal or resignation from, or the termination of, the guardianship;

At other times as the court may order.

The court shall maintain a calendar for the filing of guardianship reports.

If a guardian’s report is not timely filed, the court shall enter an order for the guardian to show cause why the guardian should not be held in contempt.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 2004, ch. 68, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(ii), substituted “Every six (6) months” for “Annually, within sixty (60) days,” and “initial report” for “anniversary date of his appointment.”

Quoted in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Dec. 29, 2015).

§ 3-2-110.
Appointment of department of health or the department of family services as guardian.

The department of health or the department of family services may petition any district court in the state to be appointed guardian of a minor who is in its custody.

If a department in subsection (a) of this section is not the petitioner in a proceeding to appoint a guardian for a ward in its custody, it shall not be appointed guardian unless given prior notice and opportunity for hearing.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to authority of board of charities and reform to consent to adoption, see §

1-22-109

.

§ 3-2-111.
Fees of the guardian.

The fees of the guardian shall be:

Reasonable and appropriate;

Set and approved by the court.

The fees of the guardian shall not be approved by the court unless all reports required of the guardian are current.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 1.

§ 3-2-112.
Immunity of volunteer guardian.

Any person who is appointed guardian of a ward pursuant to W.S.

3-2-104

, who serves in that capacity without compensation other than reimbursement for out-of-pocket expenses associated with the appointment and who carries out the duties of guardian as set forth in W.S.

3-2-201

in good faith and without willful or wanton misconduct or gross negligence, shall be personally immune from civil liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury to the ward.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 1.